Montana, session 2025, HB494.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 17-6-606, MCA, is amended to read:
"17-6-606. Tobacco settlement accounts -- purpose -- uses. (1) The purpose of this section is to
dedicate a portion of the tobacco settlement proceeds to fund statewide programs for tobacco disease
prevention designed to:
(a) discourage children from starting use of tobacco;
(b) assist adults in quitting use of tobacco; and
(c) provide funds for the children's health insurance program.
(2) An amount equal to 32% 17% of the total yearly tobacco settlement proceeds received after
June 30, 2003, must be deposited in a state special revenue account. Subject to subsection (5), the funds
referred to in this subsection may be used only for funding statewide programs for tobacco disease prevention
designed to prevent children from starting tobacco use and to help adults who want to quit tobacco use. The
department of public health and human services shall manage the tobacco disease prevention programs and
shall adopt rules to implement the programs. In adopting rules, the department shall consider the standards
contained in Best Practices for Comprehensive Tobacco Control Programs--August 1999 or its successor
document, published by the U.S. department of health and human services, centers for disease control and
prevention.
(3) An amount equal to 17% 32% of the total yearly tobacco settlement proceeds received after
June 30, 2003, must be deposited in a the state special revenue account provided for in 53-4-1115. Subject to
subsection (5), the funds referred to in this subsection may be used only for matching funds to secure the
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 494

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 494.1
maximum amount of federal funds for the Children's Health Insurance Program Act provided for in Title 53,
chapter 4, part 10.
(4) Funds deposited in a the state special revenue account provided for in 53-4-1115, as provided
in subsection (2) or (3), that are not appropriated within 2 years after the date of deposit must be transferred to
the trust fund.
(5) The legislature shall appropriate money from the state special revenue accounts provided for in
this section for programs for tobacco disease prevention, for the programs referred to in the subsection
establishing the account, and for funding the tobacco prevention advisory board.
(6) Programs funded under this section that are private in nature may be funded through
contracted services."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 494